Massachusetts, session 194th, H1620.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 24 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “property”, in line 904, the
following words:- “or after having reason to know that he collided with or otherwise caused
injury to any other vehicle or property,”.
SECTION 2. Section 24 of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by
inserting after the words “death of any person”, in line 954, the following words:- “or after
having reason to know that he collided with or otherwise caused injury to any person not
resulting in the death of any person,”.
of 2

SECTION 3. Section 24 of chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by
striking out the word “shall”, in line 964, and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “or
after having reason to know that he collided with or otherwise caused injury to any person,
shall,”.
of 2